District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-609.09

Appointment of attorneys.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 909
as added Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(j), 27 DCR 2632
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2 (f), 46 DCR 1318

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-610.9.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of section, see § 2(f) of the Legal Service Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-620, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1343).